Utah statutes.
48-2a-111 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Approval of conversion.

Prior to filing articles of conversion with the division, the conversion must first be approved in the manner provided for by applicable law or by the document, instrument, agreement, or other writing, as the case may be, that governs the internal affairs of the subject entity, as appropriate, and the new partnership agreement, if any, for the domestic limited partnership must be approved by the same authorization required to approve the conversion.  If applicable law, or the document, instrument, agreement, or other writing, as the case may be, that governs the internal affairs of the subject entity, does not provide for the manner of approving such conversion, then unanimous consent of the owners of the subject entity shall be required to approve the conversion and the new partnership agreement.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

